North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 11. Equine Infectious Anemia.

§ 106-405.15.
“Equine infectious anemia” defined.

Equine infectious anemia shall mean the disease wherein an animal is infected with the virus of equine infectious anemia, irrespective of the occurrence or absence of clinical signs of the disease. An animal shall be declared infected with equine infectious anemia if it is classified as a reactor to a serological test or other test approved by the State Veterinarian.

History.

1973, c. 1198, s. 1.

§ 106-405.16.
Animals infected with or exposed to equine infectious anemia declared subject to quarantine.

It is hereby declared that the disease of horses, ponies, mules and asses (and other equine animals) known as equine infectious anemia is of an infectious and contagious nature and that animals infected with, exposed to, or suspected of being carriers of the disease shall be subject to quarantine and identification as required by the rules and regulations of the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1973, c. 1198, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-405.17.
Authority to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations.

The State Board of Agriculture shall have full power to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as it deems necessary for the control and eradication of equine infectious anemia. This authority shall include, but not be limited to, the power to make regulations requiring the testing of horses, ponies, mules and asses for equine infectious anemia prior to sale, exhibition or assembly at public stables or other public places, and authority to require the owner, operator or person in charge of shows, sales, public stables and other public places to require proof of freedom from equine infectious anemia before any animal is permitted to remain on the premises. The Board shall also have the authority to set fees for such tests as necessary to recover the costs to the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1973, c. 1198, s. 3; 1981, c. 495, s. 7; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-405.18.
Implementation of control and eradication program.

The control and eradication of equine infectious anemia in North Carolina shall be conducted as far as available funds will permit, and in accordance with the rules and regulations made by the Board of Agriculture. The Board of Agriculture is hereby authorized to cooperate with the U.S. Department of Agriculture in the control and eradication of equine infectious anemia.

History.

1973, c. 1198, s. 4.

§ 106-405.19.
Violation made misdemeanor.

Any person who shall willfully move, direct the movement, or allow to be moved, from the premises where quartered any animal or animals known to be infected with equine infectious anemia, or under quarantine because of suspected exposure to equine infectious anemia, or who shall violate any provision of this Part or any rule or regulation promulgated by the Board of Agriculture under this Part shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1973, c. 1198, s. 5; 1993, c. 539, s. 778; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).